SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY -еĕаăсçоитнрвйлпкьыяуӳдмзшбчгщюжцёхфэъАĂВСÇМКГПТЕИЛФНДОĔЭРЗЮЯБХЖШЦӲУЧЬЫЪЩЙЁ

SFX P N 30
SFX P ем ен .
SFX P ем енех .
SFX P ем енччĕ .
SFX P ем ене .
SFX P ем енеччĕ .
SFX P ем енче .
SFX P ем енчех .
SFX P ем енчеччĕ .
SFX P ем енчен .
SFX P ем енченех .
SFX P 0 пе .
SFX P 0 пех .
SFX P 0 печчĕ .
SFX P 0 пеле .
SFX P 0 пелех .
SFX P 0 пелеччĕ .
SFX P 0 пелен .
SFX P 0 пеленех .
SFX P 0 пеленччĕ .
SFX P 0 сĕр .
SFX P 0 сĕрех .
SFX P 0 сĕрччĕ .
SFX P 0 шĕн .
SFX P 0 шĕнех .
SFX P 0 шĕнччĕ .
SFX P ем енчи .
SFX P ем енчиччĕ .
SFX P ем енчиех .
SFX P 0 ех .
SFX P 0 ччĕ .

SFX R N 5
SFX R 0 ччĕ [вйлмнр]
SFX R 0 чĕ [кпсçтхчш]
SFX R 0 ччĕ [вйлмнр][еиĕӳауăюя]
SFX R 0 чĕ [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][кпсçтхчш][еиĕӳауăюя]
SFX R 0 ччĕ [аеиуĕăӳэюя][кпсçтхчш][еиĕӳауăюя]

SFX S N 4
SFX S 0 ах [^аăу]
SFX S 0 х а
SFX S ă ах ă
SFX S у ăвах у

SFX T N 4
SFX T 0 ех [^ӳĕе]
SFX T 0 х а
SFX T ĕ ех ĕ
SFX T у ĕвех ӳ
